Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 43

Laborers' Liens Generally

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in §§18-43-101 —18-43-117 may not apply to §18-43-118 which was enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1868, No. 64, § 22: effective 30 days after passage.

Acts 1895, No. 23, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1895, No. 35, § 3: effective on passage.

18-43-101. Lien for production of labor.

All laborers who shall perform work and labor for any person under a written or verbal contract shall have an absolute lien on the production of their labor for the work and labor if unpaid for it.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 64, § 1, p. 176; C. & M. Dig., § 6848; Pope's Dig., § 8804; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-301.

Cross References.

Artisan liens, §18-45-101 et seq.

Contracts for services or labor, §§18-42-101,18-42-102.

Lien of employer on crop when no written contract, §18-42-110.

Liens of laborers during contract, §18-42-105.

Mechanics' liens, §18-44-101 et seq.

Priority of tenant employee's lien, §18-41-104.

18-43-102. Lien on object, etc., worked on — Liability of purchasers.

(a)(1)

Laborers who perform work and labor on any object, thing, material, or property shall have an absolute lien on the object, thing, material, or property for labor done and performed, subject to prior liens and landlord's liens for rent and supplies.

(2)

These liens may be enforced within the same time and in the same manner provided for by law to enforce laborer's liens on the production of labor done and performed.

(b)

When the object, thing, material, or property on which a lien exists as provided for in subsection (a) of this section has been sold, transferred, or disposed of before the lien has been liquidated or released, the purchaser thereof, with notice of the lien, the material, thing, object, or property so sold, transferred, or disposed of shall be liable to the amount of the lien, or so much thereof as may be necessary to liquidate the liens mentioned in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 35, §§ 1, 2, p. 39; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6864, 6865; Pope's Dig., §§ 8820, 8821; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-317, 51-318.

Cross References.

Effective period of landlord's lien on crops, §18-41-101.

Enforcement of landlord's lien for advances, §18-41-103.

18-43-103. Miner's or quarry worker's lien.

(a)

Any person working in any mines in the State of Arkansas or in any quarries, either stone or marble, shall have a lien on the output of any such mines or quarries for the amount due for his or her work. In addition thereto, his or her lien shall attach to all the machinery, tools, and implements used in quarrying or mining.

(b)

These liens shall be enforced in the manner provided for the enforcement of laborers' liens.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 23, § 1, p. 27; C. & M. Dig., § 7293; Pope's Dig., § 9349; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-319.

18-43-104. Time liens take effect.

Liens under the provisions of §§18-43-101,18-43-105 —18-43-110, and18-43-112 —18-43-117 are in full force and effect from and after the time the labor is performed.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 64, § 14, p. 224; C. & M. Dig., § 6859; Pope's Dig., § 8815; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-312.

18-43-105. Time to commence actions — Settlement.

(a)

Proceedings under this section and §§18-43-101,18-43-104,18-43-106 —18-43-110, and 118-43-112 —18-43-117 shall be commenced within eight (8) months after the work is done.

(b)

However, the employer may bring the laborer to settlement before a proper officer any time after the labor is performed by giving the laborer or his or her agent ten (10) days' notice.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 64, § 17, p. 224; C. & M. Dig., § 6862; Pope's Dig., § 8818; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-315.

18-43-106. Filing of sworn statement.

(a)(1)

Every person who has a lien as provided in this section and §§18-43-101,18-43-104,18-43-105,18-43-107—18-43-110, and18-43-112—18-43-117 and wishes to avail himself or herself of the lien by an action before a court having jurisdiction.

(2)(A)

The claimant shall make a sworn statement of the amount due after all just credits are given, to the best of his or her knowledge and belief, and state the kind of service, and for whom rendered, materials furnished, etc. The statement shall also contain a list of land, property, crops, or other productions of his or her labor charged.

(B)

The truth of the sworn statement may be put in issue as in cases of attachment.

(b)

The justice of the peace shall keep the statement on file and shall enter a brief of the case on his or her judgment docket.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 64, §§ 5, 7, p. 224; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6849, 6850, 6852; Pope's Dig., §§ 8805, 8806, 8808; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-302, 51-304; Acts 2017, No. 757, § 4.

Publisher's Notes.

As enacted, Acts 1868, No. 64, § 5, contained jurisdictional amounts of two hundred dollars ($200) for exclusive jurisdiction and five hundred dollars ($500) for concurrent jurisdiction. The section has been rewritten to conform to the jurisdictional amounts for justice of the peace courts set forth in Ark. Const., Art. 7, § 40 [repealed].

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “by an action before a court having jurisdiction” for “shall, if the amount is less than one hundred dollars ($100), and may, at his or her own discretion, if the amount does not exceed three hundred dollars ($300), go before any justice of the peace in the county where the lien exists” in (a)(1).

Cross References.

Enforcement of laborer's lien, §11-4-305.

18-43-107. Notice of action.

(a)(1)

The party initiating the action shall cause notice to be given to the defendant in the usual way.

(2)

However, if the defendant is a nonresident, the notice will be given by at least two (2) insertions in the county newspaper or by posting three (3) notices, two (2) in the most public places in the township where the property is and the other at the county clerk's office, to appear and show cause why judgment shall not be rendered and the property sold.

(b)

Notice shall be given at least ten (10) days before the day of trial and must be accompanied by a copy of the sworn statement of the plaintiff.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 64, § 6, p. 224; C. & M. Dig., § 6851; Pope's Dig., § 8807; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-303; Acts 2017, No. 757, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “The party initiating the action” for “The justice of the peace” in (a)(1).

18-43-108. Proceedings for larger amounts.

When the amount exceeds three hundred dollars ($300), the proceeding will be the same as described for smaller amounts, except the plaintiff shall make a sworn statement before the clerk of the circuit court, and there shall be thirty (30) days' notice given to the defendant before the day of trial.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 64, § 18, p. 224; C. & M. Dig., § 6851; Pope's Dig., § 8807; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-305.

Publisher's Notes.

As enacted, Acts 1868, No. 64, § 18, contained the jurisdictional amount of five hundred dollars. The section has been rewritten to conform to the jurisdictional amounts for justice of the peace courts set forth in Ark. Const., Art. 7, § 40 [repealed].

18-43-109. Officer to take charge of property.

At the same time the notice is given to the defendant, the sheriff or constable shall take charge of the property as described in the statement of the plaintiff and hold it subject to the decision of the court, as in cases of attachment.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 64, § 8, p. 224; C. & M. Dig., § 6853; Pope's Dig., § 8809; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-306.

18-43-110. Jury trial.

Either plaintiff or defendant may, by requesting the court, have the case tried by a competent jury of six (6) persons.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 64, § 9, p. 224; C. & M. Dig., § 6854; Pope's Dig., § 8810; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-307.

18-43-111. Laborer allowed attorney's fee.

When a laborer who has filed a lien for wages gives notice thereof to the debtor or owner of the property, which has been subjected to the lien in writing sent by registered or certified mail, and the claim has not been paid within twenty (20) days from the date of the mailing and the laborer is required to sue for the enforcement of his or her claim for wages, the court shall allow the laborer a reasonable attorney's fee in addition to other relief to which he or she may be entitled.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 240, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-639.

18-43-112. Sale of property.

If the amount adjudged to be due is not paid, with the cost of suit, on the day of trial, then the sheriff or constable shall immediately advertise the property charged for sale at public auction and sell it in not less than fifteen (15) days nor more than twenty-five (25) days from the date the judgment is rendered.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 64, § 10, p. 224; C. & M. Dig., § 6855; Pope's Dig., § 8811; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-308.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1868, No. 64, § 10, provided, in part, that when any real estate was to be sold under a lien for labor, the justice of the peace should immediately file a copy of the judgment rendered in the county clerk's office, the county clerk should place the judgment in his judgment docket, and cause the sheriff to sell the real estate after having given thirty days' notice of the sale. This provision has been superseded by Ark. Const., Art. 7, § 40 [repealed] which provides that a justice of the peace shall not have jurisdiction in proceedings involving a lien upon land.

18-43-113. Execution on judgment.

In all cases in which the property charged does not sell for enough to satisfy the judgment rendered, with all costs of suit, in favor of the claimant, execution may issue upon the judgment in the same manner as an ordinary judgment at law against any other property of the defendant.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 64, § 11, p. 224; C. & M. Dig., § 6856; Pope's Dig., § 8812; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-309.

18-43-114. Pro rata distribution.

(a)

When there are several liens for labor on the same land, crop, or property of the same date, or which are equally just, and not enough to satisfy all claims, the sale will be made, the costs paid, and the money divided pro rata among the several claimants.

(b)

The courts shall make the pro rata division as provided for in subsection (a) of this section and shall make the proper credits on the execution.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 64, §§ 12, 13, p. 224; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6857, 6858; Pope's Dig., §§ 8813, 8814; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-310, 51-311.

18-43-115. Real estate not exempt.

No real estate shall be exempt from sale under an execution on a laborer's lien.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 64, § 20, p. 224; C. & M. Dig., § 6863; Pope's Dig., § 8819; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-316.

18-43-116. Land to be sold with buildings.

In selling buildings under the provisions of this section and §§18-43-101,18-43-104 —18-43-110,18-43-112 —18-43-115, and18-43-117, a reasonable amount of land will be sold with them, not to exceed two (2) acres, surrounding the building.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 64, § 15, p. 224; C. & M. Dig., § 6860; Pope's Dig., § 8816; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-313.

18-43-117. Bill of sale or deed.

The officers making any sale as provided in this chapter shall make out the necessary bill of sale or deed.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 64, § 16, p. 224; C. & M. Dig., § 6861; Pope's Dig., § 8817; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-314.

18-43-118. Lien on crops.

(a)

Every person who harvests agricultural crops belonging to another shall be entitled to a lien against those crops for payment of the cost of harvesting.

(b)

Every person who sprays fertilizer, pesticides, or herbicides as a custom applicator on the agricultural crops or lands belonging to another shall be entitled to a lien for the payment of the custom application, and that lien shall be against those crops sprayed or the crops next harvested after the land is sprayed.

(c)

The lien provided for in this section shall be filed in the manner prescribed for materialmen's liens under §18-44-117.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1273, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in §§18-43-101 —18-43-117 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.